Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska68-1738
Department of Health and Human Services; duty.

The Department of Health and Human Services shall make state funds available which are appropriated to meet the needs of people living on tribal lands or in tribal service areas as defined in section 43-1503 if the people residing on tribal lands or in tribal services areas choose to operate their own welfare reform programs.

Laws 1999, LB 475, § 2.